test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-haanis_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:




  Adjective - häänis: # 2A v-k-v, C > C (pelikukke) / CC, A_VEESKIR
    häänis+A+Sg+Nom: häänis
    häänis+A+Sg+Gen: háánnás
    häänis+A+Sg+Acc: háánnás
    häänis+A+Sg+Ill: hánásân
    häänis+A+Sg+Loc: hánásist
    häänis+A+Sg+Com: hánásáin
    häänis+A+Sg+Abe: [hánásttáá, háánnásttáá]
    häänis+A+Ess: [hánásin, hänisin]
    häänis+A+Par: [hánásid, hänisid]
    häänis+A+Pl+Nom: hánáseh
    häänis+A+Pl+Gen: hánásij
    häänis+A+Pl+Acc: hánásijd
    häänis+A+Pl+Ill: hánásáid
    häänis+A+Pl+Loc: hánásijn
    häänis+A+Pl+Com: hánásijguin
    häänis+A+Pl+Abe: hánásijttáá
